Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3512
Applicant; education and examination requirements; waiver; when.

(1) An applicant for licensure under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act shall:

(a) Be certified as a surgical first assistant by an approved certifying body;

(b) Have successfully completed an approved surgical first assistant education program approved by the board or other experiential or training program as approved by the board;

(c) Have passed a nationally recognized surgical first assistant examination adopted by the board; and

(d) Have a high school diploma or the equivalent as determined by the board.

(2) The department may waive the education and examination requirements under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act for an applicant who:

(a) By January 1, 2017, submits demonstrated evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she has been functioning as a surgical first assistant as his or her primary function in a licensed health care facility within the last five years prior to September 1, 2016;

(b) By January 1, 2017, submits evidence of holding a current certification as a surgical first assistant issued by an approved certifying body; or

(c) Submits evidence of holding a credential as a surgical first assistant issued by another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia which has standards substantially equivalent to those of this state.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 12.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.